Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 3. Prohibition of Smoking.

Cross references. —

For provision providing legislative intent for AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

, see sec. 1, ch. 60, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts. For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 changes to AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.350

and

18.35.399

, see sec. 16, ch. 60, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Opinions of attorney general. —

In light of the repeal of former AS

18.35.360

, which granted the Department of Environmental Conservation’s authority to write regulations in implementation of this article, (1) the department may promulgate legislative-type regulations which are truly necessary to implementation of the article; (2) the department may not promulgate other legislative-type regulations, such as those which are helpful but not strictly necessary to the statutory scheme; and (3) the department may issue interpretive regulations which offer suggested guidelines on implementing the article.
June 22, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, §§ 55 et seq., 90 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 44 — 48.

Validity, construction, and application of nonsmoking regulations. 65 ALR4th 1205.

Sec. 18.35.300.
Places where smoking is regulated.

History.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 60 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 18.35.301.
Prohibition of smoking.

An individual may not smoke in an enclosed area in a public place, including an enclosed area

at an entertainment venue or a sports arena;

on a bus, in a taxicab, on a ferry, or in another vehicle used for public transportation;

at a public transit depot, bus shelter, airport terminal, or other public transportation facility;

at a retail store or shopping center;

at a place of government or public assembly located on property that is owned or operated by the state, a municipality, or a regional educational attendance area, or by an agent of the state, a municipality, or a regional educational attendance area.

An individual may not smoke in an enclosed area

in an office building, office, hotel, motel, restaurant, bar, retail store, or shopping center;

in a common area in an apartment building or multiple-family dwelling;

in a place of employment, including a vehicle;

at a public or private educational facility;

at a health care facility, including residential units in the health care facility;

in a building or residence that is used to provide paid child care, whether or not children are present in the building or residence, or care for adults on a fee-for-service basis; however, nothing in this paragraph is intended to prohibit an individual from smoking in a private residence that is in a building where another residence provides paid child care or care for adults;

on a vessel operating as a shore-based fisheries business under AS 43.75.

An individual may not smoke outdoors

within 10 feet of playground equipment located at a public or private school or a state or municipal park while children are present;

in a seating area for an outdoor arena, stadium, or amphitheater;

at a place of employment or health care facility that has declared the entire campus or outside grounds or property to be smoke-free;

within

10 feet of an entrance to a bar or restaurant that serves alcoholic beverages;

20 feet of an entrance, open window, or heating or ventilation system air intake vent at an enclosed area at a place where smoking is prohibited under this section; or

a reasonable distance, as determined by the owner or operator, of an entrance, open window, or heating or ventilation system air intake vent of

a vessel covered by this section; or

a long term care facility as defined in AS

47.62.090

.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, unless the owner or operator prohibits it, an individual may smoke at a retail tobacco or e-cigarette store that

is in a building that

is freestanding; or

if it is attached to another business or building,

has a separate entrance;

is separated from the other business or building in a manner that does not allow e-cigarette vapor or aerosol to travel into the other business or building;

the other business or building does not serve as a residence, child care facility, facility providing care for adults on a fee-for-service basis, school, or health care facility; and

smoking is limited to the use of an e-cigarette;

is not

a business that is licensed under AS 04.11 to serve alcoholic beverages at an outdoor location;

a business that is licensed under AS 05.15 to sell pull-tabs; or

a retail store that is within an indoor public place or workplace.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, smoking may be permitted in a separate enclosed smoking area located in a terminal for international passengers who are in transit in a state-owned and state-operated international airport and who are restricted by federal law from leaving the airport, if the smoking area is vented directly to an outdoor area that is not an area where smoking is prohibited under (c) of this section.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, unless the owner or operator prohibits it, an individual may smoke

in a vehicle that is a place of employment when the vehicle is used exclusively by one person;

on a vessel when the vessel is engaged in commercial fishing or sport charter fishing.

Notwithstanding (a) and (b) of this section, an individual may smoke at

a private club if the private club

has been in continuous operation at the same location since January 1, 2017;

is not licensed to serve alcoholic beverages; and

is not a place of employment;

an e-cigarette store if the e-cigarette store has been in continuous operation at the same location since January 1, 2017.

Nothing in this section prohibits an individual from smoking

at a private residence, except a private residence described in (b) of this section or while a health care provider is present;

in a stand-alone shelter if the stand-alone shelter meets the following requirements:

food or drink may not be sold or served in the stand-alone shelter; and

the stand-alone shelter meets the minimum distance requirements of (c) of this section; or

in an establishment licensed under AS 17.38 that is freestanding if the smoking is in accordance with regulations adopted by the Marijuana Control Board created under AS

17.38.080

.

In this section,

“freestanding” means a building that is not supported by another structure and does not share ventilation or internal air space with an adjoining structure and smoke from the building cannot travel into the adjoining structure;

“health care provider” has the meaning given in AS

09.65.300

;

“private club” means an organization, legal entity, or informal association of persons that

is the owner, lessee, or occupant of a building or portion of a building used exclusively for club purposes at all times;

is operated solely for a recreational, fraternal, social, patriotic, political, benevolent, or athletic purpose; and

has been granted exemption from the payment of federal income tax as a club under 26 U.S.C. 501;

“retail tobacco or e-cigarette store”

means a store

that primarily sells cigarettes, e-cigarettes, cigars, tobacco and products containing tobacco, and pipes and other smoking or e-cigarette accessories;

in which the sale of other products is incidental; and

that derives at least 90 percent of its gross revenue from the sale of cigarettes, e-cigarettes, cigars, tobacco and products containing tobacco, and pipes and other smoking or e-cigarette accessories;

does not include

a tobacco or e-cigarette department or section of a business that does not meet the criteria in (A) of this paragraph; or

a business that is also a restaurant or grocery store.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.

Sec. 18.35.305.
Places where smoking is prohibited.

History.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 60 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 18.35.306.
Notice of prohibition.

A person who is in charge of a place or vehicle where smoking is prohibited under AS

18.35.301

shall conspicuously display in the place or vehicle a sign that

reads “Smoking Prohibited by Law—Fine $50”;

includes the international symbol for no smoking; or

includes the words “No Puffin” with a pictorial representation of a puffin holding a burning cigarette enclosed in a red circle crossed with a red bar.

A person in charge of a building at which smoking is prohibited within a specific distance from the entrance of the building under AS

18.35.301(c)(4)

shall conspicuously display a sign that reads “Smoking within (number of feet) Feet of Entrance Prohibited by Law—Fine $50” visible from the outside of each entrance to the building.

The department shall furnish signs required under this section to a person who requests them with the intention of displaying them.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.

Sec. 18.35.310.
Exemptions.

History.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 60 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 18.35.311.
Duty of employers and building managers.

An employer may not permit an employee, customer, or other person to smoke inside an enclosed area at a place of employment.

The owner, operator, manager, or other person who manages a building or other place where smoking is prohibited under AS

18.35.301

may not provide ashtrays or other smoking accessories for use in that building or place.

An employer may not require an employee, customer, or other person to enter a stand-alone shelter as defined in AS

18.35.301(h)

for a purpose other than smoking.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.

Sec. 18.35.316.
Powers and duties of the commissioner.

The commissioner

shall administer and enforce the requirements of AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

;

may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to carry out the duties under this section.

In addition to other powers granted the commissioner under AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

, the commissioner may delegate to another agency the authority to implement and enforce one or more provisions of AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.

Sec. 18.35.320.
Designation of smoking sections.

History.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 60 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 18.35.321.
Public education.

The commissioner shall ensure that employers, property owners, property operators, and other members of the public are provided ongoing access to

a program of education regarding the requirements in AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

;

an electronically published printable brochure that summarizes the requirements in AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

.

The program of education under (a) of this section may be provided in combination with the comprehensive smoking education, tobacco use prevention, and tobacco control program established in AS

44.29.020(a)(14)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.

Sec. 18.35.326.
Nonretaliation.

An employer may not discharge or in any other manner retaliate against an employee because the employee cooperates with or initiates enforcement of a requirement in AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

.

The owner or operator of a vehicle or other place that is subject to a requirement in AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

may not retaliate against a customer or other member of the public for cooperating with or initiating enforcement of a requirement in AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.

Sec. 18.35.330.
Display of smoking and no smoking signs.

History.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 60 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 18.35.331.
Conflicts with local requirements.

Nothing in
AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

prohibits a municipality from adopting an ordinance imposing additional

limitations on smoking;

duties on employers, owners, operators, and other persons who are subject to the requirements of AS

18.35.306

or

18.35.311

related to smoking; or

limitations on smoking in an outdoor area at a municipal park designated as a children’s playground.

History.

(§ 2 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.

Sec. 18.35.340.
Civil complaints; penalties.

The commissioner shall develop and maintain a procedure for processing reports of violations of AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, and

18.35.326

.

If, after investigating a report made under this section, the commissioner determines that a violation has occurred, (1) the commissioner may file a civil complaint in the district court to enforce the provisions of AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

; or (2) an employee of the department designated by the commissioner to enforce the provisions of AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

may issue a citation under AS

18.35.341

(b). If an employee of the department issues a citation, the violation shall be processed and disposed of under AS

18.35.341

.

A person who violates AS

18.35.301

and against whom the commissioner has filed a civil complaint under this section is punishable by a civil fine of $50. A person who violates AS

18.35.306

or

18.35.311

and against whom the commissioner has filed a civil complaint under this section is punishable by a civil fine of not less than $50 nor more than $300. Each day a violation of AS

18.35.306

or

18.35.311

continues after a civil complaint for the violation has been filed and served on the defendant constitutes a separate violation. A person who violates AS

18.35.326

and against whom the commissioner has filed a civil complaint under this section is punishable by a civil fine of not more than $500.

The department may provide for the payment of civil fines under this section by mail.

History.

(§ 1 ch 125 SLA 1975; am § 6 ch 34 SLA 1984; am §§ 7, 8 ch 64 SLA 1990; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

and 18.35.325” for “AS

18.35.300

,

18.35.305

, and

18.35.330

”; in (b), substituted “AS 18.35.201 —

18.35.399

” for “AS

18.35.300

—

18.35.365

” twice; in (c), in the first sentence, substituted “AS

18.35.301

” for “AS 18.35.300 or

18.35.305

” following “who violates”, and deleted “not less than $10 nor more than” following “a civil fine of”, in the second sentence, substituted “AS

18.35.306

or

18.35.311

” for “AS

18.35.330

” following “who violates”, and substituted “not less than $50” for “not less than $20” following “civil fine of”, in the third sentence substituted “AS 18.35.306 or 18.35.311” for “AS 18.35.330” following “a violation of”, added the last sentence.

Revisor’s notes. —

In subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the phrase “or of a regulation adopted under AS

18.35.360

” was deleted from each subsection in 1984 to correct a manifest error made when SCS CSHB 84 (Fin) was amended to effect the repeal of AS

18.35.360

.
The amended bill became ch. 34, SLA 1984.

Sec. 18.35.341.
Citations; penalty.

A peace officer may issue a citation for a violation of AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

committed in the officer’s presence or for a violation of AS

18.35.306

. The provisions of AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

apply to the issuance of a citation under this subsection.

An employee of the department designated by the commissioner to enforce the provisions of AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

may issue a citation for a violation of AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

regardless of whether the violation was committed in the employee’s presence. A citation issued under this subsection shall be in the same form and shall be processed in the same manner as a citation issued by a peace officer under (a) of this section. An employee of the department may not arrest a person for a violation of AS 18.35.301,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

.

A person who violates AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

is guilty of a violation as defined in AS

11.81.900(b)

and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of $50 for a violation of AS

18.35.301

, by a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $300 for a violation of AS

18.35.306

or

18.35.311

, and by a fine of not more than $500 for a violation of AS

18.35.326

. Each day a violation of AS 18.35.306 or 18.35.311 continues after a citation for the violation has been issued constitutes a separate violation.

The supreme court shall establish a schedule of bail amounts for violations of AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, and

18.35.326

, but in no event may the bail amount exceed the maximum fine that may be imposed for the violation under (c) of this section. The bail amount for a violation must appear on the citation.

If a person cited for a violation under this section does not contest the citation, the person may, on or before the 30th day after the date of the citation, mail or personally deliver to the clerk of the court in which the citation is filed

the amount of bail indicated on the citation for that violation; and

a copy of the citation indicating that the right to an appearance is waived, a plea of no contest is entered, and the bail is forfeited.

When bail has been forfeited under (e) of this section, a judgment of conviction shall be entered. Forfeiture of bail is a complete satisfaction for the violation. The clerk of the court accepting the bail shall provide the violator with a receipt stating that fact if requested.

A person cited under this section is guilty of failure to obey a citation under AS

12.25.230

if the person fails to pay the bail amount established under (d) of this section or fails to appear in court as required.

History.

(§ 7 ch 34 SLA 1984; am §§ 9 — 12 ch 64 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 25 SLA 1995; am §§ 35 — 37 ch 29 SLA 2010; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision providing legislative intent for AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

, see sec. 1, ch. 60, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts. For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 changes to AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.350

and

18.35.399

, see sec. 16, ch. 60, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 1, 2018, in (a), substituted “AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

” for “AS

18.35.300

or

18.35.305

”, following “citation for a violation of”, and “AS

18.35.306

” for “AS

18.35.330

” following “or for a violation of”; in (b), substituted “AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

” for “AS

18.35.300

—

18.35.365

” following “enforce the provisions of”, and twice substituted “AS 18.35.301,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

” for “AS 18.35.300,

18.35.305

, or

18.35.330

” following “a violation of”; in (c), substituted “AS 18.35.301, 18.35.306, 18.35.311, or 18.35.326” for “AS 18.35.300, 18.35.305, or 18.35.330” following “A person who violates”, substituted “a fine of $50 for a violation of AS 18.35.301 and by a fine of not less than $50” for “a fine of not less than $10 nor more than $50 for a violation of AS 18.35.300 or 18.35.305 and by a fine of not less than $20” following “is punishable by”, and substituted “AS 18.35.306 or 18.35.311, and by a fine of not more than $500 for a violation of AS 18.35.326” for “AS 18.35.330” at the end of the first sentence, substituted “AS 18.35.306 or 18.35.311” for “AS 18.35.330” following “a violation of” in the last sentence; in (d), substituted “AS 18.35.301, 18.35.306, 18.35.311, or 18.35.326” for “AS 18.35.300, 18.35.305, or 18.35.330” following “violations of”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a), (e), and (g) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 18.35.342.
Multiple fines prohibited.

A person may not be fined more than once for each violation of AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 34 SLA 1984; am § 13 ch 64 SLA 1990; am § 10 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 1, 2108, substituted “AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

” for “AS

18.35.300

,

18.35.305

, or

18.35.330

” following “each violation of”.

Sec. 18.35.343.
Injunctions.

The commissioner or any affected party may institute an action in the superior court to enjoin repeated violations of AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 34 SLA 1984; am § 14 ch 64 SLA 1990; am § 11 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

The phrase “or of a regulation adopted under AS

18.35.360

” was deleted from this section in 1984 to correct a manifest error made when SCS CSHB 84 (Fin) was amended to effect the repeal of AS

18.35.360

.
The amended bill became ch. 34, SLA 1984.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 1, 2018, substituted “AS

18.35.301

,

18.35.306

,

18.35.311

, or

18.35.326

” for “AS

18.35.300

,

18.35.305

, or

18.35.330

” following “violations of”.

Sec. 18.35.350.
Enforcement authority.

The commissioner or the commissioner’s designee is responsible for enforcing the provisions of AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

. This section does not limit the authority of peace officers.

History.

(E.O. No. 51 § 37 (1981); am § 8 ch 34 SLA 1984; am § 12 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

The phrase “and the regulations adopted under AS

18.35.360

” was deleted from this section in 1984 to correct a manifest error made when SCS CSHB 84 (Fin) was amended to effect the repeal of AS

18.35.360

.
The amended bill became ch. 34, SLA 1984.
The word “section” was added in the second sentence in 1981.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 1, 2018, substituted “AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

” for “AS

18.35.300

—

18.35.365

” following “the provisions of”.

Sec. 18.35.355.
Public education.

History.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 60 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 18.35.357.
Municipal regulation.

A municipality may, by ordinance ratified by voters in a regular municipal election, exempt the municipality from the provisions of AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.350

. Unless the municipality has adopted an ordinance banning smoking in certain public places, if a municipality exempts itself from the provisions of AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.350

, former AS

18.35.300

—

18.35.365

apply in the municipality as those statutes provided on September 30, 2018.

History.

(§ 13 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.

Sec. 18.35.359.
Local option election by an established village.

If a majority of the voters voting on the question vote to approve the option, AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.350

do not apply within the boundaries of the established village and former AS

18.35.300

—

18.35.365

apply in the village as those statutes provided on September 30, 2018.

A ballot question to adopt a local option under this section must at least contain language substantially similar to the following: “Shall (name of village) adopt a local option not to comply with AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.350

, relating to smoking in certain public places? (yes or no).”

If a majority of the voters voting on the question vote to remove the option, an established village shall remove a local option previously adopted under (a) of this section. The option is repealed effective the first day of the month following certification of the results of the election.

A ballot question to remove a local option under (c) of this section must at least contain language substantially similar to the following: “Shall (name of village) remove the local option currently in effect, that permits smoking in certain public places, so that there is no longer any local option in effect? (yes or no).”

An election to adopt a local option under (a) of this section or remove a local option under (c) of this section shall be conducted as required in this section.

Upon receiving a petition of 35 percent or more of the registered voters residing within an established village, the lieutenant governor shall place on a separate ballot at a special election the local option or removal of a local option that constitutes the subject of the petition. The lieutenant governor shall conduct the election under AS 15.

An election under (f) of this section to remove a local option may not be conducted during the first 24 months after the local option was adopted or more than once in a 36-month period.

After a petition has been certified as sufficient to meet the requirements of (f) of this section, another petition may not be filed or certified until after the question presented in the first petition has been voted on.

Except as provided under (j) and (k) of this section, for purposes of this section, the perimeter of an established village is a circle around the established village that includes an area within a five-mile radius of the post office of the established village. If the established village does not have a post office, the perimeter of an established village is a circle around the established village that includes an area within a five-mile radius of another site selected by the local governing body or by the department if the established village does not have a local governing body.

If the perimeter of an established village determined under (i) of this section includes an area that is within the perimeter of another established village, and the other established village has not adopted a local option under (a) of this section, the local option does not apply in the overlapping area.

If the department determines that the perimeter of an established village determined under (i) of this section does not accurately reflect the perimeter of the established village, the department may establish the perimeter of the established village and the overlapping areas described under (j) of this section for purposes of applying a local option selected under this section.

If a majority of the voters vote to adopt a local option under (a) of this section or remove a local option under (c) of this section, the lieutenant governor shall notify the department of the results of the election immediately after the results are certified. The department shall immediately notify the Department of Law and the Department of Public Safety of the results of the election.

History.

(§ 13 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.

Sec. 18.35.360.
Regulations. [Repealed, § 10 ch 34 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 18.35.365.
Definitions.

History.

[Repealed, § 15 ch 60 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 18.35.399.
Definitions.

In
AS

18.35.301

—

18.35.399

,

“business” means a for-profit or nonprofit sole proprietorship, partnership, joint venture, corporation, professional corporation, private club, retail seller of goods or services, or other business entity;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services or the commissioner’s designee;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“e-cigarette” means any product containing or delivering nicotine or any other substance intended for human consumption that can be used by a person through inhalation of vapor or aerosol from the product, of any size or shape, whether the product is manufactured, distributed, marketed, or sold as an e-cigarette, e-cigar, e-pipe, e-hookah, vape pen, or any other product name or descriptor; “e-cigarette” does not include drugs, devices, or combination products authorized for sale by the United States Food and Drug Administration as those terms are defined in 21 U.S.C. 301 — 392 (Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act), unless the use of those products simulate smoking or expose others to vapor or aerosol;

“employee” means a person who is employed by a business for compensation or works for a business as a volunteer without compensation;

“employer” means the state, a municipality, a regional educational attendance area, and a person or a business with one or more employees;

“enclosed area” means space between a floor and a ceiling that is bounded on two or more sides by a combination of walls, doorways, windows, or other physical barriers that may be open, partially open, closed, retractable, temporary, or permanent;

“established village” means an area that does not contain any part of an incorporated city or another established village, that is an unincorporated community in the unorganized borough, and that has 25 or more permanent residents;

“health care facility” means an office or institution providing care or treatment for physical, mental, emotional, or other medical, dental, physiological, or psychological diseases or conditions; private, municipal, or state hospital; independent diagnostic testing facility; primary care outpatient facility; skilled nursing facility; kidney disease treatment center, including freestanding hemodialysis units; intermediate care facility; ambulatory surgical facility; Alaska Pioneers’ Home or Alaska Veterans’ Home administered by the department under AS 47.55; long-term care facility; psychiatric hospital; residential psychiatric treatment center, as defined in AS

18.07.111

or AS

47.32.900

; and other facilities, places of employment, or offices operated for use by doctors, nurses, surgeons, chiropractors, physical therapists, physicians, psychiatrists, or dentists or other professional health care providers to provide health care;

“place of employment” means work areas, private offices, hotel and motel rooms, employee lounges, restrooms, conference rooms, classrooms, cafeterias, hallways, vehicles, and other employee work areas that are under the control of an employer;

“public place” includes

an area to which the public is invited or into which the public is admitted;

a place where services, goods, or facilities are offered to the public;

“smoking” means using an e-cigarette or other oral smoking device or inhaling, exhaling, burning, or carrying a lighted or heated cigar, cigarette, pipe, or tobacco or plant product intended for inhalation.

History.

(§ 14 ch 60 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 19,
ch. 60, SLA 2018 makes this section effective October 1, 2018.